Connecticut, session 2026, HB05530.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force
to study absentee ballot access in certain cities and boroughs in the state
that are unconsolidated with the towns within which such cities or
boroughs are respectively located. The task force shall examine the
feasibility of, and obstacles to, allowing voters in any such
unconsolidated city or town to apply for an absentee ballot through the
online application system established and maintained by the Secretary
of the State pursuant to subsection (b) of section 9-140 of the general
statutes for an election, primary or referendum held in such
unconsolidated city or town.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
HB5530 / File No. 521 1

HB5530 File No. 521
one of whom shall be the town clerk of a town within which all or part
of an unconsolidated city or borough is located;
(2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one of
whom shall be the clerk of an unconsolidated city or borough;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who shall be
a registrar of voters of a town within which all or part of an
unconsolidated city or borough is located;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, who shall be
a registrar of voters of a town within which all or part of an
unconsolidated city or borough is located;
(7) The Secretary of the State, or the Secretary's designee;
(8) One appointed by the Secretary, who shall be an attorney with
expertise in the election laws of the state; and
(9) The director of the Center for Voting Technology Research at The
University of Connecticut, or the director's designee.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3) or (5) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member of the
General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
(e) The Secretary of the State, or the Secretary's designee, shall be the
chairperson of the task force. Such chairperson shall schedule the first
meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty days
HB5530 / File No. 521 2

HB5530 File No. 521
after the effective date of this section.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to elections
shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
elections, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that it
submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
GAE Joint Favorable
HB5530 / File No. 521 3

HB5530 File No. 521
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which establishes a task force to study absentee ballot access
in unconsolidated cities and boroughs within municipalities, results in
no fiscal impact because the task force has the expertise to carry out the
bill's provisions.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5530 / File No. 521 4

HB5530 File No. 521
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5530
AN ACT CONCERNING A STUDY OF ABSENTEE BALLOT ACCESS
IN UNCONSOLIDATED CITIES AND BOROUGHS WITHIN A TOWN.